Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,113
Class I school district; property; sale; how conveyed.

The legal voters of a Class I school district shall also, at any annual or special meeting, authorize and direct, by a fifty-five percent vote, the sale of any schoolhouse, site, building, or other property belonging to the district when it is no longer needed for the use of the district. When real estate is sold, the district may convey it by deed signed by the president of the district, and such deed, when acknowledged by such officer to be the act of the district, may be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the real estate is situated in like manner as other deeds.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision II, § 15, p. 342;

Laws 1889, c. 78, § 8, p. 545;

R.S.1913, § 6746;

C.S.1922, § 6287;

C.S.1929, § 79-219;

R.S.1943, § 79-226;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 191, p. 754;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 23;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-507;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 759;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 40.